Ohio, session 136, HB522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 1503.35 be amended and section 4
131.52 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 131.52. (A) As used in this section : 6
(1) "Federal mineral royalty" means the state of Ohio's 7
share of payments received under 30 U.S.C. 191 from oil, gas, or 8
other mineral production on federal lands within this state, 9
including national forest system lands. 10
(2) "County of origin" means the county where a wellhead 11
or mine is located to which a federal mineral royalty is 12
attributable. 13
(B) The treasurer of state shall deposit all federal 14
mineral royalties received from the United States department of 15
the interior's office of natural resources revenue into the 16
federal mineral royalty clearing fund, which is hereby 17
established and shall be in the custody of the treasurer of 18
state but shall not be part of the state treasury. Within thirty 19
days after each deposit, the director of the office of budget 20

H. B. No. 522 Page 2
As Introduced
and management shall transfer from the fund to each county of 21
origin an amount equal to the royalty payments attributable to 22
that county. 23
(C) Money received by a county under division (B) of this 24
section may be appropriated by the board of county commissioners 25
solely for one of the following purposes: 26
(1) Planning; 27
(2) Construction and maintenance of public facilities; 28
(3) Provision of public services. 29
Sec. 1503.35. The (A) Except as provided in division (B) 30
of this section, the director of natural resources shall 31
distribute money received by the state pursuant to 16 U.S.C. 500 32
from the sale of national forest timber and other national 33
forest products to the applicable county or counties in which 34
the national forest is situated. Money received by a county 35
under this section shall be used by a county as follows: 36
(A)(1) Fifty per cent shall be used to maintain county 37
roads and bridges; 38
(B)(2) Fifty per cent shall be used for the benefit of 39
public schools. 40
(B) A federal mineral royalty, as defined in section 41
131.52 of the Revised Code, is not a forest product subject to 42
distribution under this section. Any federal mineral royalty 43
received by the state shall be deposited in accordance with that 44
section. 45
Section 2. That existing section 1503.35 of the Revised 46
Code is hereby repealed. 47